Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

31 Am. Jur. 2d Executors and Administrators §§ 1057 to 1071, 1073 to 1094; 80 Am. Jur. 2d Wills §§ 729, 730, 741.

95 C.J.S. Wills §§ 512 to 523, 532; 96 C.J.S. Wills §§ 796, 797, 800 to 804.

§ 2-11-101.
Short title and construction.

W.S.

2-11-101

through

2-11-105

may be cited as the “Uniform Foreign Probate Act”, and shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of the states which enact it.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 81, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 88-305; C.S. 1945, § 6-505; W.S. 1957, § 2-67; W.S. 1977, § 2-4-220; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cited

in

In re Estate of Miller, 541 P.2d 28,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1975).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part III,” IX Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Probate in state where assets are found of a will of nonresident which has not been admitted to probate in state of domicile, 20 ALR3d 1033.

§ 2-11-102.
Where allowed and recorded.

A will duly proved, allowed and admitted to probate outside of this state may be allowed and recorded in the proper court of any county in this state in which the testator shall have left any estate.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 81, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 88-301; C.S. 1945, § 6-501; W.S. 1957, § 2-68; W.S. 1977, § 2-4-221; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to release of mortgage indebtedness by foreign administrators or executors, see §

34-1-133

.

Foreign executor's petition for accounting by resident ancillary executors. —

Where foreign executor's petition alleged that it was beneficiary and trustee, as well as executor under decedent's will, cause of action was properly stated against resident ancillary executors for inventory of, and accounting for, property of estate. Security-First Nat'l Bank v. King, 46 Wyo. 59, 23 P.2d 851,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1933).

Probate in Wyoming before probate in decedent's domiciliary state. —

See Rice v. Tilton, 13 Wyo. 420, 80 P. 828,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1905).

§ 2-11-103.
When to be filed.

When a copy of the will and the probate thereof duly authenticated is presented by the executor or by any other person interested in the will with a petition for probate, the same shall be filed.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 81, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 88-302; C.S. 1945, § 6-502; W.S. 1957, § 2-69; W.S. 1977, § 2-4-222; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-11-104.
Admission to probate; effect.

If upon presentation it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the will has been duly proved, allowed and admitted to probate outside of this state and that it was executed according to the law of the place in which the same was made, or in which the testator was at the time domiciled, or in conformity with the laws of this state, it shall be admitted to probate, which probate has the same force and effect as the original probate of a domestic will.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 81, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 88-303; C.S. 1945, § 6-503; W.S. 1957, § 2-70; W.S. 1977, § 2-4-223; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Stated in

Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Reed, 768 P.2d 566,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part III,” IX Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1974).

§ 2-11-105.
Procedure when foreign law does not require probate; filing, recording and effect.

When a duly authenticated copy of a will from any state or country where probate is not required by the laws of the state or country, with a duly authenticated certificate of the legal custodian of the original will that the same is a true copy and that the will has become operative by the laws of the state or country, and when a copy of a notarial will in possession of a notarial officer in a foreign state or country entitled to the custody thereof (the laws of which state or country require that the will remain in the custody of the notarial officer), duly authenticated by the notarial officer, is presented by the executor or other persons interested to the proper court in this state, the court shall take the proofs as may be appropriate.

If it appears to the court that the instrument should be allowed in this state as the last will and testament of the deceased, the copy shall be filed and recorded and the will has the same effect as if originally proved and allowed in the court.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 81, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 88-304; C.S. 1945, § 6-504; W.S. 1957, § 2-71; W.S. 1977, § 2-4-224; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2011, ch. 113, § 2.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “notarial officer” for “notary” throughout.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 5, ch. 81, Laws 1921, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Cited in

Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).